Utah statutes.
49-11-601.   Payment of employer contributions -- Penalties for failure to
comply -- Adjustments to be made.
(1)  The employer contributions, fees, premium taxes, contribution
adjustments, and other required payments shall be paid to the office by the
participating employer as determined by the executive director.
(2)  A participating employer that fails to withhold the amount of any member
contributions, as soon as administratively possible, shall also pay the member
contributions to the office out of its own funds.
(3)  Except as limited by Subsections (6) and (7), if a participating employer
does not make the contributions required by this title within 60 days of the
end of the pay period, the participating employer is liable to the office as
provided in Section 49-11-604 for:
(a)  delinquent contributions;
(b)  interest on the delinquent contributions as calculated under Section
49-11-503; and
(c)  a 12% per annum penalty on delinquent contributions.
(4)  The executive director may waive all or any part of the interest,
penalties, expenses, and fees if the executive director finds there were
extenuating circumstances surrounding the participating employer's failure to
comply with this section.
(5)  Contributions made in error will be refunded to the participating
employer or member that made the contributions.
(6) (a)  An employer described in Subsections 49-13-202(2)(c) or (d) that paid
retirement benefits to an employee or retiree that were not required by this
title, may offer the retirement benefits paid to the employee as a substantial
substitute to service credit and retirement benefits that may have been earned
by the employee under this title.
(b)  An employee who received retirement benefits under Subsection (6)(a) may
sign an affidavit that:
(i)  acknowledges the substantial substitute received by the employee under
Subsection (6)(a); and
(ii)  irrevocably relinquishes service credit and retirement benefits that may
have accrued to the employee under this title effective from the employee's
date of employment with the employer described in Subsection (6)(a) to the
date of the employer's election under Section 49-13-202.
(c)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish an employer's
right to recover past retirement benefits other than Social Security, paid to
an employee or retiree, in error or under mistaken belief that the employer
was not a participating employer.
(7)  If the employer files with the office an irrevocable written
relinquishment of service credit signed by the member or retiree:
(a)  the office shall proportionally reduce any delinquent contributions,
penalties, fees, or interest assessed against a participating employer in
connection with a member or retiree described in Subsection (6)(a); and
(b)  the system has no liability to the employee for benefits relinquished
under Subsection (6)(b).
